Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6009YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2478 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 314.32 Staff sergeant William 1 Nathaniel Howard highway. 2 The segment of the highway known as United States highway 30 3 within the corporate limits of the city of Marshalltown shall 4 be designated as the âStaff Sergeant William Nathaniel Howard 5 Highwayâ in honor of William âNateâ Howard, who was killed in 6 action in Palmyra, Syria, on December 13, 2025, while serving 7 in the Iowa army national guard. 8 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to the segment of 9 United States highway 30 within the corporate limits of the 10 city of Marshalltown on the effective date of this Act, and 11 shall apply to that segment thereafter regardless of whether 12 the highwayâs designation as United States highway 30 is 13 subsequently changed by the government of the United States. 14